New York, session 2025-2026, A11564.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 106 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law, as amended by chapter 83 of the laws of 1995, paragraph (a) 3 as amended by chapter 160 of the laws of 2024, paragraph (b) as amended 4 and paragraph (c) as added by section 1 of part FF of chapter 55 of the 5 laws of 2020, is amended to read as follows: 6 5. No alcoholic beverages shall be sold, offered for sale or given 7 away upon any premises licensed to sell alcoholic beverages at retail 8 for on-premises consumption, during the following hours: 9 (a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subdivision, on 10 Sunday, from four ante meridiem to ten o'clock a.m., except pursuant to 11 a permit issued under section ninety-nine-h or subdivision five of 12 section ninety-seven of this chapter. 13 (b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subdivision, on any 14 other day between four ante meridiem and eight ante meridiem. 15 (c) On any day between three ante meridian and six ante meridian, for 16 a premises located within an international airport owned or operated by 17 the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey. The provisions of this 18 paragraph shall not be subject to change pursuant to subdivision eleven 19 of section seventeen of this chapter. 20 Unless otherwise approved by the authority pursuant to subdivision 21 eleven of section seventeen of this chapter, where any rule has been 22 adopted in a county on or before April first, nineteen hundred ninety- 23 five, further restricting the hours of sale for alcoholic beverages, 24 such restricted hours shall be the hours, during which the sale of alco- 25 holic beverages at retail for on-premises consumption shall not be 26 permitted within such county; provided, however, that for the period EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15599-03-6 A. 11564 2 1 commencing on June eleventh, two thousand twenty-six and ending on July 2 twentieth, two thousand twenty-six, any on-premises consumption licensee 3 may sell or offer for sale alcoholic beverages in accordance with the 4 provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subdivision notwithstanding 5 the fact that a county may have previously imposed more restrictive 6 hours of operation within the county. This change in hours shall not 7 apply in any case where the authority may have imposed more restrictive 8 hours as a condition of a license. 9 Nor shall any person be permitted to consume any alcoholic beverages 10 upon any such premises later than one-half hour after the start of the 11 prohibited hours of sale provided for in this section. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 13 deemed repealed July 21, 2026.